Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 5

Appeals

69-5-501. Right of appeal — Time — Notice — Bond.

Any party aggrieved may appeal from the decision of the court in establishing, or refusing to establish, the improvement district, or its decision in the allowance of damages, such appeal being to the circuit court, and any party so desiring to appeal shall have the right to have the benefit of appeal at any time within five (5) days after the decision is made, without formally praying an appeal, by filing with the clerk of the county a notice of the appeal, at the same time filing with such clerk a bond, to be approved by the clerk in the sum and condition prescribed in §69-5-502.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 4; Shan., § 3871a39; Code 1932, § 4256; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1101; T.C.A. §69-6-501.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-502. Penalty and condition of appeal bond.

Any person opposing the creation of such district who appeals from the judgment of the county court establishing the district shall execute bond, with good security, in the penalty of four percent (4%) of the estimated cost of the improvement, as shown by the engineer's report, and conditioned to pay all such damages, actual, and also punitive, if any, and costs as may be suffered by the district and the petitioners for the damages, if such appeal is not successfully prosecuted, such damages to be recovered by suit upon the bond or writ of inquiry in the circuit court, which may be awarded in such cases. If the appeal is from a judgment of the county court refusing to establish the district, the appeal bond shall be for costs only. The appeal bonds, when made by persons asking damages or by persons opposing the establishment of such district, shall be made payable to the state of Tennessee, for the use of those entitled, upon which bond judgment may be rendered in favor of the party or parties litigant for costs, and suits maintained for damages, actual, and also punitive, if any, in the name of the state, for the use of the district or parties entitled.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 4; Shan., § 3871a40; Code 1932, § 4257; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1102; T.C.A. §69-6-502.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-503. Appeal bonds by district — Petitioner signing for district — Sureties — No pauper oath.

If an order has been entered by the county court creating or establishing a district, and giving it a name or designation, the appeal bonds, when the district or petitioners for the bonds are appellants, may be made by the district in such name, to be signed by some one (1) of the petitioners nominated for that purpose by the county court, it being declared the duty of the county court to so nominate some of the petitioners for this purpose; and on any appeal from the circuit court to an appellate court, the name of the district, if it has been ordered established by the county court, may in like manner be signed to any appeal bond, the circuit court nominating the petitioner to so sign it. Nothing in this chapter is to be construed as excusing the giving of good security on any such bonds for appeal, and the district shall be liable for any damages and costs adjudged against it on any appeal, as well as the sureties on the bonds; and the oath provided by law for poor persons shall not be allowed in lieu of any of the bonds.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 4; Shan., § 3871a41; Code 1932, § 4258; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1103; T.C.A. §69-6-503.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-504. Continuation of work pending appeal.

When an appeal is taken and prosecuted from the judgment of the county court awarding damages, such appeal shall not prevent the work of the improvement or district being proceeded with, and the appropriation and condemnation of the lands, as provided by §§69-5-207 —69-5-209, if the district, or the petitioners for the district, or any of them, will give bond, with good security, payable to the party or person awarded damages, in double the amount of damages awarded and costs as may be awarded on appeal.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 4; Shan., § 3871a42; Code 1932, § 4259; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1104; T.C.A. §69-6-504.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-505. Damages — Recording and certification of award.

The circuit court shall hear any such appeal de novo; and if the appeal is from the amount of damages allowed by the county court, the amount ascertained and fixed by the circuit court shall be entered of record, but no judgment shall be entered for that amount. The amount thus ascertained shall be certified by the clerk of the circuit court to the county court, which court shall thereafter proceed as if the amount had been by it allowed the claimant as damages.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a43; Code 1932, § 4260; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1105; T.C.A. §69-6-505.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-506. Establishment of district — Circuit court order.

If the appeal is from the action of the county court in establishing, or refusing to establish, the drainage or levee district, the circuit court shall enter such order as it deems just and proper in the premises, and the clerk of that court shall certify the order to the county court, which shall proceed thereafter in the matter in accordance with the order of the circuit court.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a44; Code 1932, § 4261; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1106; T.C.A. §69-6-506.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-507. Docketing — Consolidation — Transcript.

In the circuit court, in such cases, the cases shall be docketed with the appellant or appellants as plaintiffs and the adversary parties as defendants, and where there are several appellants on questions of damages, the circuit court may consolidate the causes and try them together, if practicable, making proper findings or orders as to each; and in appeals from orders of the county court made at the same session where there are several appellants, at their request only one (1) transcript shall be made out by the court clerk.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a45; Code 1932, § 4262; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1107; T.C.A. §69-6-507.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-508. Costs.

On appeals under this part, it shall rest in the discretion of the circuit court how the costs shall be adjudged and distributed among the litigants.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a46; Code 1932, § 4263; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1108; T.C.A. §69-6-508.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

69-5-509. Trial with or without jury.

The trial in the circuit court shall be with or without a jury, as the court may deem the right of the parties to be under the particular issues to be tried, the right to a jury being accorded wherever the parties have such right under the law of the land.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a47; Code 1932, § 4264; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-1109; T.C.A. §69-6-509.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.